Washington statutes.
RCW 43.82.030

Acquisition of property and rights declared public use—Eminent domain.

The acquisition of any real property or any rights or interests therein for the purpose of this chapter is hereby declared to be for a public use. In furtherance of the purposes of this chapter, the right of eminent domain may be exercised as provided for in chapter 8.04 RCW.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.82.030. Prior: 1959 c 255 s 3.]